California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 304, Sec. 11.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10168.7.

Any contract which does not provide cash surrender benefits or does not provide death benefits at least equal to the minimum nonforfeiture amount prior to the commencement of any annuity payments shall include a statement in a prominent place in the contract that such benefits are not provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

10168.8.

Any paid-up annuity, cash surrender or death benefits available at any time, other than on the contract anniversary under any contract with fixed scheduled considerations, shall be calculated with allowance for the lapse of time and the payment of any scheduled considerations beyond the beginning of the contract year in which cessation of payment of considerations under the contract occurs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

10168.9.

For any contract which provides, within the same contract by rider or supplemental contract provision, both annuity benefits and life insurance benefits that are in excess of the greater of cash surrender benefits or a return of the gross considerations with interest, the minimum nonforfeiture benefits shall be equal to the sum of the minimum nonforfeiture benefits for the annuity portion and the minimum nonforfeiture benefits, if any, for the life insurance portion computed as if each portion were a separate contract. Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 10168.3, 10168.4, 10168.5, 10168.6, and 10168.8, additional benefits payable (a) in the event of total and permanent disability, (b) as reversionary annuity or deferred reversionary annuity benefits, or (c) as other policy benefits additional to life insurance, endowment, and annuity benefits, and considerations for all such additional benefits, shall be disregarded in ascertaining the minimum nonforfeiture amounts, paid-up annuity, cash surrender and death benefits that may be required by this article. The inclusion of such additional benefits shall not be required in any paid-up benefits, unless such additional benefits separately would require minimum nonforfeiture amounts, paid-up annuity, cash surrender and death benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

10168.92.

The commissioner may adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 381, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10168.93.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the form of any annuity contract that is subject to this article shall be filed by the obligor under the contract with the commissioner before it is marketed, issued, delivered, or used in this state.

(b) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as requiring or providing for the prior approval by the commissioner of forms of individual annuity contracts prior to the time the forms are marketed, issued, delivered, or used in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 601, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10168.10.

After the effective date of this article, any company may file with the commissioner a written notice of its election to comply with the provisions of this article after a specified date before the second anniversary of the effective date of this article. After the filing of such notice, then upon such specified date, which shall be the operative date of this article for such company, this article shall become operative with respect to annuity contracts thereafter issued by such company. If a company makes no such election, the operative date of this article for such company shall be the second anniversary of the effective date of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Appeals Seeking Independent Medical Review [10169. - 10169.5.]

10169.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2001, there is hereby established in the department the Independent Medical Review System.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, “disputed health care service” means any health care service eligible for coverage and payment under a disability insurance contract that has been denied, modified, or delayed by a decision of the insurer, or by one of its contracting providers, in whole or in part due to a finding that the service is not medically necessary. A decision regarding a disputed health care service relates to the practice of medicine and is not a coverage decision. A disputed health care service does not include services provided by a group or individual policy of vision- or dental-only coverage, except to the extent that (1) the
 service involves the practice of medicine, or (2) is provided pursuant to a contract with a disability insurer that covers hospital, medical, or surgical benefits. If an insurer, or one of its contracting providers, issues a decision denying, modifying, or delaying health care services, based in whole or in part on a finding that the proposed health care services are not a covered benefit under the contract that applies to the insured, the statement of decision shall clearly specify the provision in the contract that excludes that coverage.

(c) For the purposes of this chapter, “coverage decision” means the approval or denial of health care services by a disability insurer, or by one of its contracting entities, substantially based on a finding that the provision of a particular service is included or excluded as a covered benefit under the terms and conditions of the disability insurance contract. A coverage decision does not encompass a
 disability insurer or contracting provider decision regarding a disputed health care service.

(d) (1) All insured grievances involving a disputed health care service are eligible for review under the Independent Medical Review System if the requirements of this article are met. If the department finds that an insured grievance involving a disputed health care service does not meet the requirements of this article for review under the Independent Medical Review System, the insured request for review shall be treated as a request for the department to review the grievance. All other insured grievances, including grievances involving coverage decisions, remain eligible for review by the department.

(2) In any case in which an insured or provider asserts that a decision to deny, modify, or delay health care services was based, in whole or in part, on
 consideration of medical necessity, the department shall have the final authority to determine whether the grievance is more properly resolved pursuant to an independent medical review as provided under this article.

(3) The department shall be the final arbiter when there is a question as to whether an insured grievance is a disputed health care service or a coverage decision. The department shall establish a process to complete an initial screening of an insured grievance. If there appears to be any medical necessity issue, the grievance shall be resolved pursuant to an independent medical review as provided under this article.

(e) Every disability insurance contract that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered in this state on or after January 1, 2000, shall provide an insured with the opportunity to seek an independent medical review whenever health care services have been
 denied, modified, or delayed by the insurer, or by one of its contracting providers, if the decision was based in whole or in part on a finding that the proposed health care services are not medically necessary. For purposes of this article, an insured may designate an agent to act on his or her behalf. The provider may join with or otherwise assist the insured in seeking an independent medical review, and may advocate on behalf of the insured.

(f) Medicare beneficiaries enrolled in Medicare + Choice products shall not be excluded unless expressly preempted by federal law.

(g) The department may seek to integrate the quality of care and consumer protection provisions, including remedies, of the Independent Medical Review System with related dispute resolution procedures of other health care agency programs, including the Medicare program, in a way that minimizes the potential for
 duplication, conflict, and added costs. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit any rights conferred upon insureds under this chapter.

(h) The independent medical review process authorized by this article is in addition to any other procedures or remedies that may be available.

(i) Every disability insurer shall prominently display in every insurer member handbook or relevant informational brochure, in every insurance contract, on insured evidence of coverage forms, on copies of insurer procedures for resolving grievances, on letters of denials issued by either the insurer or its contracting organization, and on all written responses to grievances, information concerning the right of an insured to request an independent medical review when the insured believes that health care services have been improperly denied, modified, or delayed by the insurer, or by one of
 its contracting providers. The department’s telephone number, 1-800-927-4357, and Internet Web site, www.insurance.ca.gov, shall also be displayed.

(j) An insured may apply to the department for an independent medical review when all of the following conditions are met:

(1) (A) The insured’s provider has recommended a health care service as medically necessary, or

(B) The insured has received urgent care or emergency services that a provider determined was medically necessary, or

(C) The insured, in the absence of a provider recommendation under subparagraph (A) or the receipt of urgent care or emergency services by a provider under subparagraph (B), has been seen by a contracting provider for the diagnosis or treatment of the
 medical condition for which the insured seeks independent review. The insurer shall expedite access to a contracting provider upon request of an insured. The contracting provider need not recommend the disputed health care service as a condition for the insured to be eligible for an independent review.

For purposes of this article, the insured’s provider may be a noncontracting provider. However, the insurer shall have no liability for payment of services provided by a noncontracting provider, except as provided pursuant to Section 10169.3.

(2) The disputed health care service has been denied, modified, or delayed by the insurer, or by one of its contracting providers, based in whole or in part on a decision that the health care service is not medically necessary.

(3) The insured has filed a grievance with the insurer or its contracting
 provider, and the disputed decision is upheld or the grievance remains unresolved after 30 days. The insured shall not be required to participate in the insurer’s grievance process for more than 30 days. In the case of a grievance that requires expedited review, the insured shall not be required to participate in the insurer’s grievance process for more than three days.

(k) An insured may apply to the department for an independent medical review of a decision to deny, modify, or delay health care services, based in whole or in part on a finding that the disputed health care services are not medically necessary, within six months of any of the qualifying periods or events under subdivision (j). The commissioner may extend the application deadline beyond six months if the circumstances of a case warrant the extension.

(l) The insured shall pay no application or processing
 fees of any kind.

(m) As part of its notification to the insured regarding a disposition of the insured’s grievance that denies, modifies, or delays health care services, the insurer shall provide the insured with a one- or two-page application form approved by the department, and an addressed envelope, which the insured may return to initiate an independent medical review. The insurer shall include on the form any information required by the department to facilitate the completion of the independent medical review, such as the insured’s diagnosis or condition, the nature of the disputed health care service sought by the insured, a means to identify the insured’s case, and any other material information. The form shall also include the following:

(1) Notice that a decision not to participate in the independent review process may cause the insured to forfeit any statutory right to
 pursue legal action against the insurer regarding the disputed health care service.

(2) A statement indicating the insured’s consent to obtain any necessary medical records from the insurer, any of its contracting providers, and any noncontracting provider the insured may have consulted on the matter, to be signed by the insured.

(3) Notice of the insured’s right to provide information or documentation, either directly or through the insured’s provider, regarding any of the following:

(A) A provider recommendation indicating that the disputed health care service is medically necessary for the insured’s medical condition.

(B) Medical information or justification that a disputed health care service, on an urgent care or emergency basis, was medically
 necessary for the insured’s medical condition.

(C) Reasonable information supporting the insured’s position that the disputed health care service is or was medically necessary for the insured’s medical condition, including all information provided to the insured by the insurer or any of its contracting providers, still in the possession of the insured, concerning an insurer or provider decision regarding disputed health care services, and a copy of any materials the insured submitted to the insurer, still in the possession of the insured, in support of the grievance, as well as any additional material that the insured believes is relevant.

(4) A section designed to collect information on the insured’s ethnicity, race, and primary language spoken that includes both of the following:

(A) A statement of intent
 indicating that the information is used for statistics only, in order to ensure that all insureds get the best care possible.

(B) A statement indicating that providing this information is optional and will not affect the independent medical review process in any way.

(n) Upon notice from the department that the insured has applied for an independent medical review, the insurer or its contracting providers, shall provide to the independent medical review organization designated by the department a copy of all of the following documents within three business days of the insurer’s receipt of the department’s notice of a request by an insured for an independent review:

(1) (A) A copy of all of the insured’s medical records in the possession of the insurer or its contracting providers relevant to
 each of the following:

(i) The insured’s medical condition.

(ii) The health care services being provided by the insurer and its contracting providers for the condition.

(iii) The disputed health care services requested by the insured for the condition.

(B) Any newly developed or discovered relevant medical records in the possession of the insurer or its contracting providers after the initial documents are provided to the independent medical review organization shall be forwarded immediately to the independent medical review organization. The insurer shall concurrently provide a copy of medical records required by this subparagraph to the insured or the insured’s provider, if authorized by the insured, unless the offer of medical records is declined or
 otherwise prohibited by law. The confidentiality of all medical record information shall be maintained pursuant to applicable state and federal laws.

(2) A copy of all information provided to the insured by the insurer and any of its contracting providers concerning insurer and provider decisions regarding the insured’s condition and care, and a copy of any materials the insured or the insured’s provider submitted to the insurer and to the insurer’s contracting providers in support of the insured’s request for disputed health care services. This documentation shall include the written response to the insured’s grievance. The confidentiality of any insured medical information shall be maintained pursuant to applicable state and federal laws.

(3) A copy of any other relevant documents or information used by the insurer or its contracting providers in determining whether disputed
 health care services should have been provided, and any statements by the insurer and its contracting providers explaining the reasons for the decision to deny, modify, or delay disputed health care services on the basis of medical necessity. The insurer shall concurrently provide a copy of documents required by this paragraph, except for any information found by the commissioner to be legally privileged information, to the insured and the insured’s provider. The department and the independent medical review organization shall maintain the confidentiality of any information found by the commissioner to be the proprietary information of the insurer.

(o) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 348, Sec. 19) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 206.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10169.1.

(a) If there is an imminent and serious threat to the health of the insured, as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 10169.3, all necessary information and documents shall be delivered to an independent medical review organization within 24 hours of approval of the request for review. In reviewing a request for review, the department may waive the requirement that the insured follow the insurer’s grievance process in extraordinary and compelling cases, where the commissioner finds that the insured has acted reasonably.

(b) The department shall expeditiously review requests and immediately notify the insured in writing as to whether the request for an independent medical review has been approved, in whole or in part, and, if not approved, the reasons therefor. The insurer shall promptly issue a notification to the insured, after submitting all of the required material to the independent medical review organization, that includes an annotated list of documents submitted and offer the insured the opportunity to request copies of those documents from the insurer. The department shall promptly approve insured requests whenever the insurer has agreed that the case is eligible for an independent medical review. The department shall not refer coverage decisions for independent review. To the extent an insured request for independent review is not approved by the department, the insured request shall be treated as an immediate request for the department to review the grievance.

(c) An independent medical review organization, specified in Section 10169.2, shall conduct the review in accordance with Section 10169.3 and any regulations or orders of the commissioner adopted pursuant thereto. The organization’s review shall be limited to an examination of the medical necessity of the disputed health care services and shall not include any consideration of coverage decisions or other contractual issues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 533, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10169.2.

(a) The department shall contract with one or more independent medical review organizations in the state to conduct reviews for purposes of this article. The independent medical review organizations shall be independent of any disability insurer doing business in this state. The commissioner may establish additional requirements, including conflict-of-interest standards, consistent with the purposes of this article, that an organization shall be required to meet in order to qualify for participation in the Independent Medical Review System and to assist the department in carrying out its responsibilities.

(b) The independent medical review
 organizations and the medical professionals retained to conduct reviews shall be deemed to be medical consultants for purposes of Section 43.98 of the Civil Code.

(c) The independent medical review organization, any experts it designates to conduct a review, or any officer, director, or employee of the independent medical review organization shall not have any material professional, familial, or financial affiliation, as determined by the commissioner, with any of the following:

(1) The insurer.

(2) Any officer, director, or employee of the insurer.

(3) A physician, the physician’s medical group, or the independent practice association involved in the health
 care service in dispute.

(4) The facility or institution at which either the proposed health care service, or the alternative service, if any, recommended by the insurer, would be provided.

(5) The development or manufacture of the principal drug, device, procedure, or other therapy proposed by the insured whose treatment is under review, or the alternative therapy, if any, recommended by the insurer.

(6) The insured or the insured’s immediate family.

(d) In order to contract with the department for purposes of this article, an independent medical review organization shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) The organization shall not be an affiliate or a subsidiary of, nor in any way be owned or controlled by, a disability insurer or a trade association of insurers. A board member, director, officer, or employee of the independent medical review organization shall not serve as a board member, director, or employee of a disability insurer. A board member, director, or officer of a disability insurer or a trade association of insurers shall not serve as a board member, director, officer, or employee of an independent medical review organization.

(2) The organization shall submit to the department the following information upon initial application to contract for purposes of this article and, except as otherwise provided, annually thereafter upon any change to any of the following information:

(A) The names of all stockholders and owners of more than 5 percent of any stock or options, if a publicly held organization.

(B) The names of all holders of bonds or notes in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), if any.

(C) The names of all corporations and organizations that the independent medical review organization controls or is affiliated with, and the nature and extent of any ownership or control, including the affiliated organization’s type of business.

(D) The names and biographical sketches of all directors, officers, and executives of the independent medical review organization, as well as a statement regarding any past or present relationships the directors, officers, and executives may have
 with any health care service plan, disability insurer, managed care organization, provider group, or board or committee of an insurer, a plan, a managed care organization, or a provider group.

(E) (i) The percentage of revenue the independent medical review organization receives from expert reviews, including, but
 not limited to, external medical reviews, quality assurance reviews, and utilization reviews.

(ii) The names of any insurer or provider group for which the independent medical review organization provides review services, including, but not limited to, utilization review, quality assurance review, and external medical review. Any change in this information shall be reported to the department within five business days of the change.

(F) A description of the review process including, but not limited to, the method of selecting expert reviewers and matching the expert reviewers to specific cases.

(G) A description of the system the independent medical review organization uses to identify and recruit
 medical professionals to review treatment and treatment recommendation decisions, the number of medical professionals credentialed, and the types of cases and areas of expertise that the medical professionals are credentialed to review.

(H) A description of how the independent medical review organization ensures compliance with the conflict-of-interest provisions of this section.

(3) The organization shall demonstrate that it has a quality assurance mechanism in place that does the following:

(A) Ensures that the medical professionals retained are appropriately credentialed and privileged.

(B) Ensures that the reviews provided by the medical professionals
 are timely, clear, and credible, and that reviews are monitored for quality on an ongoing basis.

(C) Ensures that the method of selecting medical professionals for individual cases achieves a fair and impartial panel of medical professionals who are qualified to render recommendations regarding the clinical conditions and the medical necessity of treatments or therapies in question.

(D) Ensures the confidentiality of medical records and the review materials, consistent with the requirements of this section and applicable state and federal law.

(E) Ensures the independence of the medical professionals retained to perform the reviews through conflict-of-interest policies and prohibitions, and ensures adequate screening for
 conflicts of interest, pursuant to paragraph (5).

(4) Medical professionals selected by independent medical review organizations to review medical treatment decisions shall be physicians or other appropriate providers who meet the following minimum requirements:

(A) The medical professional shall be a clinician expert in the treatment of the insured’s medical condition and knowledgeable about the proposed treatment through recent or current actual clinical experience treating patients with the same or a similar medical condition as the insured.

(B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the medical professional shall hold a nonrestricted license in any state of the United States, and for physicians, a
 current certification by a recognized American medical specialty board in the area or areas appropriate to the condition or treatment under review. The independent medical review organization shall give preference to the use of a physician licensed in California as the reviewer, except when training and experience with the issue under review reasonably requires the use of an out-of-state reviewer.

(C) The medical professional shall have no history of disciplinary action or sanctions, including, but not limited to, loss of staff privileges or participation restrictions, taken or pending by any hospital, government, or regulatory body.

(5) Neither the expert reviewer, nor the independent medical review organization, shall have any material professional, material familial, or material
 financial affiliation with any of the following:

(A) The disability insurer or a provider group of the insurer, except that an academic medical center under contract to the insurer to provide services to insureds may qualify as an independent medical review organization provided it will not provide the service and provided the center is not the developer or manufacturer of the proposed treatment.

(B) Any officer, director, or management employee of the insurer.

(C) The physician, the physician’s medical group, or the independent practice association (IPA) proposing the treatment.

(D) The institution at which the treatment would be provided.

(E) The development or manufacture of the treatment proposed for the insured whose condition is under review.

(F) The insured or the insured’s immediate family.

(6) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(A) “Material familial affiliation” means any relationship as a spouse, child, parent, sibling, spouse’s parent, or child’s spouse.

(B) “Material professional affiliation” means any physician-patient relationship, any partnership or employment relationship, a shareholder or similar ownership interest in a professional corporation, or any independent contractor arrangement
 that constitutes a material financial affiliation with any expert or any officer or director of the independent medical review organization. “Material professional affiliation” does not include affiliations that are limited to staff privileges at a health facility.

(C) “Material financial affiliation” means any financial interest of more than 5 percent of total annual revenue or total annual income of an independent medical review organization or individual to which this subdivision applies. “Material financial affiliation” does not include payment by the insurer to the independent medical review organization for the services required by this section, nor does “material financial affiliation” include an expert’s participation as a contracting provider where the expert is affiliated with an academic medical center or a National Cancer
 Institute-designated clinical cancer research center.

(e) The department shall provide, upon the request of any interested person, a copy of all nonproprietary information, as determined by the commissioner, filed with it by an independent medical review organization seeking to contract under this article. The department may charge a nominal fee to the interested person for photocopying the requested information.

(f) The commissioner may contract with the Department of Managed Health Care to administer the independent medical review process established by this article.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 9) and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 872, Sec. 10.   (SB 1410)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Section operative July 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10169.3.

(a) Upon receipt of information and documents related to a case, the medical professional reviewer or reviewers selected to conduct the review by the independent medical review organization shall promptly review all pertinent medical records of the insured, provider reports, as well as any other information submitted to the organization as authorized by the department or requested from any of the parties to the dispute by the reviewers. If reviewers request information from any of the parties, a copy of the request and the response shall be provided to all of the parties. The reviewer or reviewers shall also review relevant information related to the criteria set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) Following its review, the reviewer or reviewers shall determine whether the disputed health care service was medically necessary based on the specific medical needs of the insured and any of the following:

(1) Peer-reviewed scientific and medical evidence regarding the effectiveness of the disputed service.

(2) Nationally recognized professional standards.

(3) Expert opinion.

(4) Generally accepted standards of medical practice.

(5) Treatments that are likely to provide a benefit to a patient for conditions for which other treatments are
 not clinically efficacious.

(c) The organization shall complete its review and make its determination in writing, and in layperson’s terms to the maximum extent practicable, within 30 days of the receipt of the application for review and supporting documentation, or within less time as prescribed by the commissioner. If the disputed health care service has not been provided and the insured’s provider or the department certifies in writing that an imminent and serious threat to the health of the insured may exist, including, but not limited to, serious pain, the potential loss of life, limb, or major bodily function, or the immediate and serious deterioration of the health of the insured, the analyses and determinations of the reviewers shall be expedited and rendered within three days of the receipt of the information. Subject to the
 approval of the department, the deadlines for analyses and determinations involving both regular and expedited reviews may be extended by the commissioner for up to three days in extraordinary circumstances or for good cause.

(d) The medical professionals’ analyses and determinations shall state whether the disputed health care service is medically necessary. Each analysis shall cite the insured’s medical condition, the relevant documents in the record, and the relevant findings associated with the provisions of subdivision (b) to support the determination. If more than one medical professional reviews the case, the recommendation of the majority shall prevail. If the medical professionals reviewing the case are evenly split as to whether the disputed health care service should be provided, the decision shall be in favor of providing the
 service.

(e) The independent medical review organization shall provide the director, the insurer, the insured, and the insured’s provider with the analyses and determinations of the medical professionals reviewing the case, and a description of the qualifications of the medical professionals. The independent medical review organization shall keep the names of the reviewers confidential in all communications with entities or individuals outside the independent medical review organization, except in cases where the reviewer is called to testify and in response to court orders. If more than one medical professional reviewed the case and the result was differing determinations, the independent medical review organization shall provide each of the separate reviewer’s analyses and determinations.

(f) The commissioner shall immediately adopt the determination of the independent medical review organization, and shall promptly issue a written decision to the parties that shall be binding on the insurer.

(g) After removing the names of the parties, including, but not limited to, the insured, all medical providers, the insurer, and any of the insurer’s employees or contractors, commissioner decisions adopting a determination of an independent medical review organization shall be made available by the department
 in a searchable database on the department’s Internet Web site, after considering applicable laws governing disclosure of public records, confidentiality, and personal privacy.

(h) (1) Information regarding each commissioner decision provided by the database referenced in subdivision (g) shall include all of the following:

(A) Insured demographic profile information, including age and gender.

(B) The insured diagnosis and disputed health care service.

(C) Whether the independent medical review was for medically necessary services pursuant to this article or for experimental or investigational therapies pursuant to Section 10145.3.

(D) Whether the independent medical review was standard or expedited.

(E) Length of time from the receipt by the independent medical review organization of the application for review and supporting documentation to the rendering of a determination by the independent medical review organization in writing.

(F) Length of time from receipt by the department of the independent medical review application to the issuance of the commissioner’s determination in writing to the parties that is binding on the health
 insurer.

(G) Credentials and qualifications of the reviewer or reviewers.

(H) The nature of the statutory criteria set forth in subdivision (b) that the reviewer or reviewers used to make the case decision.

(I) The final result of the determination.

(J) The year the determination was made.

(K) A detailed case summary that includes the
 specific standards, criteria, and medical and scientific evidence, if any, that led to the case decision.

(2) The database referenced in subdivision (g) shall be accompanied by all of the following:

(A) The annual rate of independent medical review among the total insured population.

(B) The annual rate of independent medical review cases by health insurer.

(C) The number, type, and resolution of independent medical review cases by health insurer.

(D) The number, type, and resolution of independent medical review cases by ethnicity, race, and primary language spoken.

(i) This section shall become operative on
 July 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 11) and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 872, Sec. 12.   (SB 1410)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Section operative July 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10169.5.

(a) After considering the results of a competitive bidding process and any other relevant information on program costs, the commissioner shall establish a reasonable, per-case reimbursement schedule to pay the costs of independent medical review organization reviews, which may vary depending on the type of medical condition under review and on other relevant factors.

(b) The costs of the independent medical review system for insureds shall be borne by disability insurers pursuant to an assessment fee system established by the commissioner. In determining the amount to be assessed, the commissioner shall consider all appropriations available for the support of this article, and existing fees paid to the department. The commissioner may adjust fees upward or downward, on a schedule set by the department, to address shortages or overpayments, and to reflect utilization of the independent review process.

(c) The commissioner may contract with the Department of Managed Health Care to administer the requirements of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 64.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Payment and Proceeds [10170. - 10180.]

10170.

Life insurance may be made payable as follows:

(a) On the death of the insured.

(b) On his or her surviving a specified period.

(c) Periodically as long as he or she lives.

(d) Otherwise contingently on the continuance or determination of life.

(e) Upon those terms and conditions and subject to those restrictions as to revocation by the policyholder and control by beneficiaries as shall have been agreed to in writing by the insurer and the
 policyholder. If no terms and conditions have been agreed to by the insurer and the policyholder during the insured’s lifetime then upon those terms and conditions and subject to those restrictions as may be agreed to in writing by the insurer and the beneficiaries. Any agreement may be rescinded or amended by the parties to the agreement without the consent of any designated beneficiary unless the rights of any beneficiary have been expressly declared to be irrevocable. No agreement hereafter made shall vest in the insurer discretion as to the conditions, time, amount, manner, or method of payment. The relationship between the insurer and the policyholder or beneficiaries under any agreement shall be that of debtor and creditor, and the insurer shall not be required to segregate funds so held but shall hold them as a part of its general corporate assets.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), all life insurance benefits shall be paid in the form